nb: Teinngangstype: Vesker; Blomstrer; Kapsler; Komprimert; Instant; K-kopper; Løs; Teputer; T-disker; Annet
fi: Teensyöttötyyppi: Pussit; Kukat; Kapselit; Tiivistetty; Pika; K-kupit; Irto; Säiliöt; T-disks; Muu
vi: Loại trà đầu vào: Trà túi lọc; Trà hoa; Trà viên; Trà nén; Trà uống liền; Trà dạng cốc; Trà sợi rời; Trà viên nén; Trà T-disk; Khác
pl: Typ surowca herbacianego: Torby; Kwitnienie; Kapsułki; Skompresowany; Natychmiastowy; K-cups; Luźny; Pody; Dyski T; Inne
en: Tea input type: Bags; Blossoms; Capsules; Compressed; Instant; K-cups; Loose; Pods; T-disks; Other
it: Tipo di preparazione tè: Bustine; Fiori; Capsule; Compresso; Immediata; K-cup; Sfuso; Pastiglie; Dischi a T; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de entrada de chá: Bolsas; Flores; Cápsulas; Compactado; Instantâneo; Em cápsulas; Granel; Saquinhos; Cápsulas em T; Outro
hu: Tea kiszerelési típusa: Táskák; Virágok; Kapszulák; Tömörített; Azonnali; K-csészék; Szálas; Hüvelyek; T-lemezek; Egyéb
hr-HR: Način pripreme čaja: Vrećice; Cvjetovi; Kapsule; Komprimirani; Instant; Kapsule K-cups; U rinfuzi; Kapsulirani; U diskovima; Ostalo
zh-CN: 茶叶输入类型: 茶包; 花; 胶囊; 压缩; 速溶; 单杯包装; 松散; 滤包; T 盘; 其他
sv: Tetyp: Påsar; Blommig; Kapslar; Komprimerad; Omedelbar; K-koppar; Löst; Poddar; T-diskar; Övrigt
fr: Type d’insertion du thé: Sacs; Aux fleurs; Capsules; Comprimé; Instantané; K-cups; En vrac; Dosettes; T-disks; Autre
de: Teezubereitungstyp: Taschen; Blüten; Kapseln; Komprimiert; Sofortig; K-Cups; Lose; Kapseln; T-Disks; Sonstiges
tr: Çay Giriş Tipi: Poşet çay; Yapraklı; Kapsüller; Sıkıştırılmış; Hızlı; Keurig fincan; Yaprak çay; Kapsül; Tassimo kapsüller; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ balenia čaju: Tašky; Kvety; Kapsuly; Stlačený; Instantný; K-poháre; Sypaný; Kapsule; T-disky; Iné
el: Τύπος υλικού για παρασκευή τσαγιού: Τσάντες; Άνθη; Κάψουλες; Συμπιεσμένο; Στιγμή; K-κύπελλα; Χύμα; Pods; Δίσκοι Τ; Άλλο
da: Teinputtype: Tasker; Blomster; Kapsler; Komprimeret; Instant; K-kopper; Løs; Puder; T-diske; Andet
ro-RO: Tip de ceai: Punguțe; Flori; Capsule; Comprimat; Instant; Capsule K; Vrac; Paduri; Paduri Tassimo; Altele
es: Tipo de entrada de té: Bolsas; Flores; Cápsulas; Comprimido; Instantáneo; Cápsulas K; A granel; Cápsulas; Discos T; Otros
zh-TW: 茶葉投入類型: 袋裝; 花; 膠囊; 壓縮; 即溶; Keurig 咖啡膠囊; 散裝; 兼容膠囊; T 盤; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de preparação de chá: Malas; De flores; Cápsulas; Comprimido; Instantâneo; Cápsulas; Para infusão; Sacos; Discos; Outro
ru: Тип приготовления чая: Пакетики; Цветки; Капсулы; Прессованный; Быстрорастворимый; K-cups; Рассыпной; Капсулы; Т-диски; Другой
th: ประเภทอินพุตชา: ถุง; ดอกไม้; แคปซูล; บีบอัด; แบบทันที; K-cups; ชาบดเต็มใบ; แบบพ็อด; พ็อดแบบทีดิสก์; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ čaje na vstupu: Sáčky; Květy; Kapsle; Lisovaný; Instantní; Kapsle K-cup; Volný; Polštářky; Kasle T-disk; Jiné
ja: 茶葉投入タイプ: バッグ; 花; カプセル; 圧縮; インスタント; Kカップ; ルースティー; ポッド; Tディスク; その他
bg-BG: Тип приготвяне на чай: Торбички; Цветове; Капсули; Компресиран; Разтворим; Капсули; Насипен; Шушулки; Т-капсули; Други
ko: 차 투입 유형: 가방; 꽃송이; 캡슐; 압축; 즉시; K컵; 헐렁한; 포드; T디스크; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta vnosa čaja: Vrečke; Cvetovi; Kapsule; Stisnjen; Takojšnja; K-cups; Razsuti; kapsule; T-diski; Drugo
lt-LT: Dedamos arbatos tipas: Paketėliai; Žiedai; Kapsulės; Presuota; Tirpi; Plastikiniai puodeliai; Biri; Kapsulės; Diskeliai; Kita
nl: Thee-invoertype: Tassen; Bloesems; Capsules; Gecomprimeerd; Direct; K-cups; Los; Pods; T-disks; Andere